Washington statutes.
RCW 38.44.050

Compensation of enrolling officer.

Each county enrolling officer shall be allowed the sum of five cents per name enrolled and served with notice of enrollment by the enrolling officer or assistants, to be audited and paid as other military bills out of any moneys in the general fund appropriated to the military department, and from such allowance the enrolling officer must pay the assistant or assistants.

[ 1991 c 43 s 13; 1989 c 19 s 59; 1909 c 134 s 8; RRS s 8460.]